apertium-oci.oci.metadix
<!-- sortir és oc i no-incoatiu=>paradigma sort/iriam -->
        <pardef n="s/o[RT]ir__vblex">        
      <e><i>o<prm/></i><par n="sort/iriam__vblex"/></e>        
      <e><p><l>ò</l><r>o</r></p><i><prm/></i><par n="cuèlh/an__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>
        <pardef n="s/o[NH]ar__vblex" alt="oci">        
      <e><i>o<prm/></i><par n="cambi/avas__vblex"/></e>        
      <e><p><l>uè</l><r>o</r></p><i><prm/></i><par n="càmbi/as__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>    
    <pardef n="/be_enon">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>be</l><r>be<s n="adv" /><s n="enon" /></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>be</l><r>be<s n="adv" /><s n="enon" /></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/que_enon">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>que</l><r>que<s n="adv" /><s n="enon" /></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>que</l><r>que<s n="adv" /><s n="enon" /></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/ne_enon">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ne</l><r>ne<s n="adv" /><s n="enon" /></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>ne</l><r>ne<s n="adv" /><s n="enon" /></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="e_enon">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv" /><s n="enon" /></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
</pardefs>

    <e lm="be" alt="oci@gascon"><i></i><par n="/be_enon"/></e>
    <e lm="que" alt="oci@gascon"><i></i><par n="/que_enon"/></e>
    <e lm="ne" alt="oci@gascon"><i></i><par n="/ne_enon"/></e>
    <e lm="e" alt="oci@gascon"><i>e</i><par n="e_enon"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="sortir" alt="oci@aran"><i>s</i><par n="s/o[RT]ir__vblex" prm="rt"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="sortir" alt="oci@gascon"><i>s</i><par n="s/o[RT]ir__vblex" prm="rt"/></e>
    <e lm="sortir" alt="oci"><i>s</i><par n="s/o[RT]ir__vblex" prm="rt"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="ressortir" alt="oci@aran"><i>ress</i><par n="s/o[RT]ir__vblex" prm="rt"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="ressortir" alt="oci@gascon"><i>ress</i><par n="s/o[RT]ir__vblex" prm="rt"/></e>
    <e lm="ressortir" alt="oci"><i>ress</i><par n="s/o[RT]ir__vblex" prm="rt"/></e>
    <e lm="sonhar" alt="oci"><i>s</i><par n="s/o[NH]ar__vblex" prm="nh"/></e>
    <e lm="b'" r="LR"><p><l>b'</l><r>be</r></p><par n="e_enon"/></e>
    <e lm="qu'" r="LR"><p><l>qu'</l><r>que</r></p><par n="e_enon"/></e>
    <e lm="n'" r="LR"><p><l>n'</l><r>ne</r></p><par n="e_enon"/></e>
